South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4805.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Circuit court judgeships SECTION 1.    Section 14-5-610 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 14-5-610.    (A) The State is divided into sixteen judicial circuits as follows: (1) The first circuit is composed of the counties of Calhoun, Dorchester, and Orangeburg. (2) The second circuit is composed of the counties of Aiken, Bamberg, and Barnwell. (3) The third circuit is composed of the counties of Clarendon, Lee, Sumter, and Williamsburg. (4) The fourth circuit is composed of the counties of Chesterfield, Darlington, Marlboro, and Dillon. (5) The fifth circuit is composed of the counties of Kershaw and Richland. (6) The sixth circuit is composed of the counties of Chester, Lancaster, and Fairfield. (7) The seventh circuit is composed of the counties of Cherokee and Spartanburg. (8) The eighth circuit is composed of the counties of Abbeville, Greenwood, Laurens, and Newberry. (9) The ninth circuit is composed of the counties of Charleston and Berkeley. (10) The tenth circuit is composed of the counties of Anderson and Oconee. (11) The eleventh circuit is composed of the counties of Lexington, McCormick, Saluda, and Edgefield. (12) The twelfth circuit is composed of the counties of Florence and Marion. (13) The thirteenth circuit is composed of the counties of Greenville and Pickens. (14) The fourteenth circuit is composed of the counties of Allendale, Hampton, Colleton, Jasper, and Beaufort. (15) The fifteenth circuit is composed of the counties of Georgetown and Horry. (16) The sixteenth circuit is composed of the counties of York and Union. (B) Two judges must be elected from the second, fourth, sixth, and sixteenth circuits. Three judges must be elected from the first, seventh, eighth, tenth, eleventh, twelfth, and fourteenth circuits. Four judges must be elected from the third and fifteenth circuits. Five judges must be elected from the ninth and thirteenth circuits. Six judges must be elected from the fifth circuit. (C) In addition to the above judges authorized by this section, there must be four additional circuit judges elected by the General Assembly from the State at large for terms of office of six years. These additional judges must be elected without regard to county or circuit of residence. Each office of the at-large judges is a separate office and is assigned numerical designations of Seat No. 1 through Seat No. 4, respectively. At-large circuit court seats converted to resident seats SECTION 2.    (A) Upon the effective date of this act: (1) At-large Circuit Court Seat 7 is converted to a resident seat and designated First Circuit Court Seat 3. (2) At-large Circuit Court Seat 1 is converted to a resident seat and designated Third Circuit Court Seat 4. (3) At-large Circuit Court Seat 4 is converted to a resident seat and designated Eighth Circuit Court Seat 3. (B) Nothing in this act may be construed to require a judge currently serving in an at-large circuit court seat which is converted to a resident circuit court seat pursuant to this act to undergo additional screening until the end of the term for which they were screened and duly elected to an at-large circuit court seat. Circuit court judge, Kershaw County SECTION 3.    The additional circuit court judge added in the fifth judicial circuit by this act must be a resident judge in Kershaw County. Circuit court judge, Oconee County SECTION 4.    The additional circuit court judge added in the tenth judicial circuit by this act must be a resident judge in Oconee County. Judicial Merit Selection Commission, screening SECTION 5.    The Judicial Merit Selection Commission shall begin the process of nominating candidates for the new judicial offices in the fifth and tenth circuit for election in 2027 as provided by law. The Judicial Merit Selection Commission shall begin the process of nominating candidates for the new judicial offices in the sixth and fifteenth circuit one year later for election in 2028 as provided by law. The General Assembly then shall elect these judges from the nominees of the commission; except that, the nominating process may not begin until funding for the additional judges is provided in the general appropriations act. Family court judgeships SECTION 6.    Section 63-3-40 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 63-3-40.    (A) The General Assembly shall elect a number of family court judges from each judicial circuit as follows: First Circuit    Four Judges Second Circuit    Two Judges Third Circuit    Three Judges Fourth Circuit    Three Judges Fifth Circuit    Six Judges Sixth Circuit    Two Judges Seventh Circuit    Four Judges Eighth Circuit    Three Judges Ninth Circuit    Seven Judges Tenth Circuit    Four Judges Eleventh Circuit    Four Judges Twelfth Circuit    Four Judges Thirteenth Circuit    Six Judges Fourteenth Circuit    Four Judges Fifteenth Circuit    Three Judges Sixteenth Circuit    Three Judges (B) In the following judicial circuits at least one family court judge must be a resident of each county in the circuit: fifth, seventh, tenth, twelfth, thirteenth, fifteenth, and sixteenth. In those judicial circuits made up of three or more counties, at least one family court judge must be a resident of one of the counties which does not have the largest population in the circuit. In the ninth circuit, both counties in the circuit must have at least two resident family court judges. (C) No county in the sixth circuit shall have more than one resident family court judge. (D) In addition to the judges authorized by this section, there must be four additional family court judges elected by the General Assembly from the State at large for terms of office of six years. These additional judges must be elected without regard to county or circuit of residence. Each office of the at-large judges is a separate office and is assigned numerical designations of Seat No. 1 through Seat No. 4, respectively. At-large family court seats converted to resident seats SECTION 7.    (A) Upon the effective date of this act: (1) At-large Family Court Seat 8 is converted to a resident seat and designated as Fifth Circuit Family Court Seat 5. (2) At-large Family Court Seat 4 is converted to a resident seat and designated as Fifth Circuit Family Court Seat 6. (3) At-large Family Court Seat 6 is converted to a resident seat and designated as Tenth Circuit Family Court Seat 4. (4) At-large Family Court Seat 3 is converted to a resident seat and designated as Twelfth Circuit Family Court Seat 4. (B) Nothing in this act may be construed to require a judge currently serving in an at-large family court seat which is converted to a resident family court seat pursuant to this act to undergo additional screening until the end of the term for which they were screened and duly elected to an at-large circuit court seat. Retirement, earned service requirement SECTION 8.    Section 9-8-60(1) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) A member of the system may retire upon written application to the board setting forth at what time, not later than the end of the calendar year in which the member attains age seventy-two and not more than ninety days prior nor more than six months subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, the member desires to be retired, if the member at the time so specified for retirement is no longer in the service of the State, except as a member of the General Assembly or as allowed pursuant to subsection (7), and has completed eight years of earned service as a judge or eight years of earned service as a solicitor or circuit public defender or was in service as a judge or solicitor on July 1, 1984, and has either: (a) attained the age of sixty-five and completed at least twenty years of credited service; (b) attained age seventy and completed at least fifteen years of credited service; or (c) completed at least twenty-five years of credited service in the system for a judge, or twenty-four years of credited service in the system for a solicitor or circuit public defender, regardless of age. A member may retire under this section if the member was a member of this system as of June 30, 2004; attained age sixty-five with at least four years' earned service in the position of judge, solicitor, or circuit public defender; and, as of June 30, 2004, had a total of twenty-five years of credited service with the State in the South Carolina Retirement System, the Police Officers Retirement System, or the Retirement System for Members of the General Assembly. A person receiving retirement allowances under this system who is elected to the General Assembly continues to receive the retirement allowances while serving in the General Assembly, and also must be a member of the retirement system unless the person files a statement with the board on a form prescribed by the board electing not to participate in the applicable system while a member of the General Assembly. A person making this election shall not make contributions to the applicable retirement system nor shall the State make contributions on the member's behalf and the person is not entitled to benefits from the applicable retirement system after ceasing to be a member of the General Assembly. Time effective SECTION 9.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________